Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0989.
People of the State of Michigan enact: Sec. 1531i. (1) The superintendent of public instruction shall establish a process for an individual to earn an interim teaching certificate under this section that qualifies the individual to teach in public schools and to earn a Michigan teaching certificate using the process under this section. The process must meet all applicable requirements for an alternative teaching certification process under the no child left behind act of 2001, Public Law 107-110, or the every student succeeds act, Public Law 114-95, as applicable. (2) Except as otherwise provided under subsection (1), the process established under subsection (1) must provide that the superintendent of public instruction will grant an interim teaching certificate to an individual who meets all of the following, as applicable: (a) Is a participant in an alternative teaching program that is approved by the superintendent of public instruction. To be approved, a program provider must demonstrate to the satisfaction of the superintendent of public instruction that it meets all of the following: (i) Subject to subdivision (e), provides for its participants an intensive training program in teaching that is determined by the superintendent of public instruction to constitute the equivalent of at least 12 college credit hours and that includes training in at least all of the following subject areas: (A) Child development or child psychology. (B) Family and community relationships. (C) Diverse learners. (D) Instructional strategies. (E) A form of field-based experience in a classroom setting. (ii) Has a proven record of producing successful teachers or is modeled after a program that has a proven record of producing successful teachers. (iii) Its participants have a cohort grade point average of at least 3.0 on a 4.0 scale or the equivalent on another scale, as determined by the superintendent of public instruction, upon earning the degree required under subdivision (b). If a cohort member has earned more than 1 degree required under subdivision (b), the highest grade point average earned by the cohort member must be used in calculating the cohort grade point average under this subparagraph. (iv) Accepts for participation only individuals who meet the requirements of subdivision (b). (b) Holds a bachelorâs, masterâs, doctorate, or professional degree from an institutionally accredited college or university. (c) Passes the appropriate available subject area examination for each subject area in which the individual applies to be certified. (d) Subject to subdivision (e) and notwithstanding any other provision of law or rule to the contrary, if the individual does not hold a Michigan teaching certificate, for an interim teaching certificate under this section for teaching special education, the individual has completed a training program for teaching special education students that is determined by the superintendent of public instruction to constitute the equivalent of at least 32 college credit hours, or equivalent clock hours, equal to 7 hours of instruction per credit hour, and that includes training in at least both of the following: (i) The requisite knowledge, understanding, skills, and dispositions for effective practice concerning all of the following: (A) Utilizing research-based models, theories, and philosophies for teaching students with an array of disabilities within different placements. (B) Assessing students with disabilities for identification and teaching. (C) Implementing accommodations and modifications for classroom assessments, school district, intermediate school district, or public school academy assessments, and statewide assessments. (D) Using assistive technology devices to increase, maintain, or improve the capabilities of students with impairments. (E) Communicating, consulting, and collaborating with parents and legal guardians, paraprofessionals, general educators, administrators, and human services personnel. (F) Developing, implementing, and evaluating individualized education programs. (G) Planning, organizing, scheduling, and conducting individualized education program team meetings, including parental and student participation in those meetings. (H) Preparing students with disabilities for transitions, including the transition from preschool to elementary school and the transition into postsecondary environments and employment. (I) Maintaining, releasing, and transferring student records according to school district, intermediate school district, or public school academy rules and policies and state and federal laws, rules, and policies. (J) Articulating the historical and legal bases regarding special education, such as the concept of free appropriate public education, general least restrictive environment requirements, and family education and privacy rights. (ii) Any additional criteria that the department determines is appropriate in the teaching of special education students. (e) Notwithstanding any other provision of law or rule to the contrary, if the individual holds a Michigan teaching certificate, for an interim teaching certificate under this section for teaching special education, the individual has completed the accelerated training program for teaching special education students as described in subdivision (d) that meets criteria established by the department and that is approved by the superintendent of public instruction. An individual described in this subdivision is not required to complete an intensive training program in teaching as described under subdivision (a)(i). (3) An individual earning a Michigan teaching certificate using the process under this section will be subject to provisions of administrative rules governing teachers, as established by the superintendent of public instruction. (4) An individual who possesses an interim teaching certificate under this section may be employed to teach in a public school in the same manner as an individual holding a Michigan teaching certificate issued under section 1531 if both of the following requirements are met: (a) While the individual is teaching under an interim teaching certificate, the school district or public school academy in which the individual is teaching provides intensive observation and coaching in a manner and to the extent prescribed by the superintendent of public instruction. (b) The individual is making satisfactory progress toward meeting the requirements for being awarded a Michigan teaching certificate under section 1531, as established by the superintendent of public instruction under subsection (5). (5) The superintendent of public instruction shall develop standards for granting an individual a Michigan teaching certificate issued under section 1531 after the individual has demonstrated satisfactory teaching performance for 3 years under an interim teaching certificate and has met the requirements established by the superintendent of public instruction for a Michigan teaching certificate. (6) The superintendent of public instruction shall promulgate rules that the superintendent of public instruction considers necessary to implement this section. (7) CEPI, in consultation with the department, shall partner with 1 or more research university or universities in this state to conduct a research study and analysis on educator shortages in this state. The department shall make any needed data available to CEPI and the selected research university or universities described in this subsection to facilitate the study and analysis described in this subsection. Using the study and analysis described in this subsection, CEPI, with its partners under this subsection, shall submit an initial report to the governor and the chairs of the senate and house standing committees responsible for education legislation that summarizes available state data, provides a baseline from which future comprehensive data analysis can begin, and includes recommendations to policymakers concerning data-gathering activities that are necessary to complete the comprehensive report described in this subsection, and by January 1 of each year, CEPI, with its partners under this subsection, shall submit a comprehensive report concerning educator shortages in this state to the governor and the chairs of the senate and house standing committees responsible for education legislation. The comprehensive report submitted by CEPI under this subsection must include, but is not limited to, all of the following: (a) The number of educator vacancies in this state, disaggregated by geographic region and by any broad subject areas and educational settings required for those vacancies. (b) The educator retention rates in this state, disaggregated by geographic region, broad subject areas and educational settings, number of years in the profession, and educator demographics. (c) The number of graduates from approved, in-state teacher preparation programs, disaggregated by the broad subject areas and educational settings of those graduates, if any. (d) An analysis of the regions in this state that present the highest need for educators based on educator shortages in those regions, disaggregated by the broad subject areas and educational settings of the positions in which there are shortages in those regions. (8) By January 1 of each year, the department shall submit a report to the governor and the chairs of the senate and house standing committees responsible for education legislation regarding the number of interim teaching certificates issued under this section for teaching special education and the retention rate for teachers who began serving as teachers in this state through usage of an interim teaching certificate issued under this section. (9) As used in this section: (a) âCEPIâ means the center for educational performance and information created under section 94a of the state school aid act of 1979, MCL 388.1694a. (b) âCohortâ means all of the individuals enrolled in an alternative teaching program approved by the superintendent of public instruction for the 3 years immediately preceding the granting of an interim teaching certificate under this section to an individual enrolled in the alternative teaching program. (c) âSubject area examinationâ means that term as defined in section 1531. This act is ordered to take immediate effect. Secretary of the Senate Clerk of the House of Representatives Approved___________________________________________ ____________________________________________________ Governor